Hawaii statutes.
§171-2 Definition of public lands.
"Public lands" means all lands or interest therein in the State
classed as government or crown lands previous to August 15, 1895, or acquired
or reserved by the government upon or subsequent to that date by purchase, exchange,
escheat, or the exercise of the right of eminent domain, or in any other
manner; including lands accreted after May 20, 2003, and not otherwise awarded,
submerged lands, and lands beneath tidal waters that are suitable for
reclamation, together with reclaimed lands that have been given the status of
public lands under this chapter, except:

(1) Lands designated in section 203 of the Hawaiian
Homes Commission Act, 1920, as amended;

(2) Lands set aside pursuant to law for the use of
the United States;

(3) Lands being used for roads and streets;

(4) Lands to which the United States relinquished the
absolute fee and ownership under section 91 of the Hawaiian Organic Act prior
to the admission of Hawaii as a state of the United States unless subsequently
placed under the control of the board of land and natural resources and given
the status of public lands in accordance with the state constitution, the
Hawaiian Homes Commission Act, 1920, as amended, or other laws;

(5) Lands to which the University of Hawaii holds
title;

(6) Lands to which the Hawaii housing finance and
development corporation in its corporate capacity holds title;

(7) Lands to which the Hawaii community development
authority in its corporate capacity holds title;

(8) Lands to which the department of agriculture
holds title by way of foreclosure, voluntary surrender, or otherwise, to
recover moneys loaned or to recover debts otherwise owed the department under
chapter 167;

(9) Lands that are set aside by the governor to the
Aloha Tower development corporation; lands leased to the Aloha Tower
development corporation by any department or agency of the State; or lands to
which the Aloha Tower development corporation holds title in its corporate
capacity;

(10) Lands that are set aside by the governor to the
agribusiness development corporation; lands leased to the agribusiness
development corporation by any department or agency of the State; or lands to
which the agribusiness development corporation in its corporate capacity holds
title; and

(11) Lands to which the high technology development
corporation in its corporate capacity holds title;

provided that, except as otherwise limited under
federal law and except for state land used as an airport as defined in section
262-1, public lands shall include the air rights over any portion of state land
upon which a county mass transit project is developed after July 11, 2005. [L
1962, c 32, pt of §2; am L 1965, c 239, §37; Supp, §103A-2; HRS §171-2; am L
1981, c 116, §1; am L 1984, c 19, §1; am L 1987, c 337, §7(1); am L 1989, c 27,
§2; am L 1990, c 86, §12; am L 1997, c 350, §14; am L 1998, c 102, §2 and c
176, §6; am L 2003, c 47, §1, c 73, §2, and c 93, §2; am L 2005, c 196, §26(b);
am L 2006, c 180, §16; am L 2012, c 56, §1 and c 282, §2; am L 2013, c 38, §2;
am L 2015, c 240, §4]

Cross References

Generally, see notes to Organic Act §73.

Legislative approval of sale or gift of lands, see §171-64.7.

Attorney General Opinions

Inasmuch as the genetic material or composition of the natural
resources and things connected to public lands, including ceded lands, are an
integral part of those resources and things, title to biogenetic resources will
still be held by State if it has not sold the land. Legal title to biogenetic
resources gathered from state public lands will not still be vested in the
State if third persons were allowed to remove from public lands the natural
resource or thing from which the biogenetic resources were extracted or the
State sold or leased title to a parcel of public land without reserving title
or retaining control of the resources or things connected to the transferred
land, or their biogenetic contents. Att. Gen. Op. 03-3.

Law Journals and Reviews

Biopiracy in Paradise?: Fulfilling the Legal Duty to Regulate
Bioprospecting in Hawai`i. 28 UH L. Rev. 387.

Case Notes

Where plaintiffs challenged department of land and natural
resources administrative regulations that required a permit for commercial
activity (including weddings performed or arranged for a fee) on public
beaches: (1) plaintiffs had standing to make an as-applied challenge; (2)
since state unencumbered beaches are non-public fora for purposes of a First
Amendment analysis, regulation need only satisfy a requirement of
reasonableness, and the regulations passed the test; assuming beaches were
public fora, the regulations passed a stricter test for constitutionality; and
(3) even if the court had jurisdiction over the breach of settlement agreement
(in prior action) claim, plaintiffs would not prevail on that claim. 685 F.
Supp. 2d 1140.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next